Luxembourgish.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY eësianrtolcdugmphbyfvkwzESIANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWZéèäüûÄ

KEY qwertzuiop|asdfghjkl|yxcvbnm

REP 62
REP wéieng wéi_eng
REP biswell bis_ewell
REP allzelaang allze_laang
REP nëtzlos onnëtz
REP annuecht an_Uecht
REP ansech u_sech
REP wanns wann_s
REP zevill ze_vill
REP wéivill wéi_vill
REP soulues esou_lues
REP engkéier eng_Kéier
REP Virunallem Virun_allem
REP virunallem virun_allem
REP allkéiers all_Kéiers
REP bisewell bis_ewell
REP allkéiers all_Kéiers
REP Tankstell Bensinsstatioun
REP säitdeem zënterhier
REP säitdeem zënter_datt
REP amt büro
REP get gëtt
REP stotteren tuddelen
REP mëss méchs
REP oft dacks
REP man maachen
REP s ss
REP ss s
REP n nn
REP mee mä
REP aa a
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP g ch
REP ch g
REP a er
REP ai äi
REP ai ä
REP eh ee
REP j ch
REP j che
REP ä ee
REP dd tt
REP s sch
REP ex ächs
REP nie ni
REP e éi
REP ée eeë
REP ch sch
REP sch ch
REP ech ësch
REP ae ä
REP l ll
REP l hl
REP ei äi
REP ch sch
REP é ee
REP z ds
REP a ar
REP ch j
REP e ee
REP ie éi
REP io jo

MAP 18
MAP äaeÄAE
MAP bB
MAP ckCK
MAP dtDT
MAP eëêéèEËÊÉÈ
MAP fvwFVW
MAP gG
MAP hH
MAP iI
MAP jJ
MAP lL
MAP mnMN
MAP oöôOÖÔ
MAP pP
MAP qQ
MAP rR
MAP sS
MAP uüûUÜÛ

BREAK 2
BREAK -
BREAK '

NOSPLITSUGS

NOSUGGEST !

SFX n Y 3
SFX n 0 en  .
SFX n 0 e   [^é]
SFX n 0 ë   [é]

SFX i Y 2
SFX i 0 nen in
SFX i 0 ne  in

SFX N Y 8
SFX N 0 n  [^i]te
SFX N e ë  [^i]te
SFX N 0 n  [^i][^t]e
SFX N e ë  [^i][^t]e
SFX N 0 n  i[^t]e
SFX N e ë  i[^t]e
SFX N ite itten ite
SFX N ite itte  ite

SFX u Y 2
SFX u us iser us
SFX u as ieser as
SFX F N 3
SFX F er esch   .
SFX F er eschen .
SFX F er esche  .

SFX I N 3
SFX I 0 in    .
SFX I 0 innen .
SFX I 0 inne  .

SFX R N 9
SFX R 0 er  i[^s]
SFX R 0 er  e[^s]
SFX R 0 er  [^ie]s
SFX R 0 er  [^ie][^s]
SFX R 0 er  [^r][éäe]is
SFX R 0 ser r[éäe]is
SFX R 0 ser [^éäe]is
SFX R 0 ser es
SFX R 0 ser es

SFX r N 2
SFX r en er .
SFX r en e  .

SFX E N 2
SFX E 0 ën .
SFX E 0 ë  .

SFX Q N 1
SFX Q 0 ër .

SFX e N 5
SFX e um  ümer  um
SFX e ag  éi    ag
SFX e uff iff   uff
SFX e all äll   all
SFX e och éch   och
SFX A Y  74
SFX A n  0       n
SFX A d  t       d
SFX A 0  t       [^ia][^td]
SFX A 0  t       bar
SFX A 0  em      .
SFX A 0  en      .
SFX A 0  e       .
SFX A 0  er      .
SFX A 0  es      .
SFX A 0  stem    [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  sten    [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  ste     [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  ster    [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  stes    [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  st      [^iao][^st]
SFX A 0  stem    bar
SFX A 0  sten    bar
SFX A 0  ste     bar
SFX A 0  ster    bar
SFX A 0  stes    bar
SFX A 0  st      bar
SFX A of ooft    of
SFX A al aalt    al
SFX A ar aart    [^b]ar
SFX A id iidt    id
SFX A in iint    [^é]in
SFX A iv iivt    iv
SFX A of oofstem of
SFX A al aalstem al
SFX A ar aarstem [^b]ar
SFX A id iidstem id
SFX A in iinstem [^é]in
SFX A iv iivstem iv
SFX A of oofsten of
SFX A al aalsten al
SFX A ar aarsten [^b]ar
SFX A id iidsten id
SFX A in iinsten [^é]in
SFX A iv iivsten iv
SFX A of oofste  of
SFX A al aalste  al
SFX A ar aarste  [^b]ar
SFX A id iidste  id
SFX A in iinste  [^é]in
SFX A iv iivste  iv
SFX A of oofster of
SFX A al aalster al
SFX A ar aarster [^b]ar
SFX A id iidster id
SFX A in iinster [^é]in
SFX A iv iivster iv
SFX A of oofstes of
SFX A al aalstes al
SFX A ar aarstes [^b]ar
SFX A id iidstes id
SFX A in iinstes [^é]in
SFX A iv iivstes iv
SFX A of oofst   of
SFX A al aalst   al
SFX A ar aarst   [^b]ar
SFX A id iidst   id
SFX A in iinst   [^é]in
SFX A iv iivst   iv
SFX A 0  estem   t
SFX A 0  esten   t
SFX A 0  este    t
SFX A 0  ester   t
SFX A 0  estes   t
SFX A 0  est     t
SFX A 0  tem    is
SFX A 0  ten    is
SFX A 0  te     is
SFX A 0  ter    is
SFX A 0  tes    is

SFX a Y  6
SFX a n  0       n
SFX a 0  em      .
SFX a 0  en      .
SFX a 0  e       .
SFX a 0  er      .
SFX a 0  es      .

SFX V Y 17
SFX V en 0  [^w]en
SFX V en e  en
SFX V en t  [^tfldw]en
SFX V en s  [^zsfldw]en
SFX V en t  [^ao][fl]en
SFX V en s  [^ao][fl]en
SFX V fen aft afen
SFX V fen afs afen
SFX V fen oft ofen
SFX V fen ofs ofen
SFX V len ols olen
SFX V len olt olen
SFX V den t   den
SFX V den ts  den
SFX V wen f wen
SFX V wen ft wen
SFX V wen fs wen

PFX g Y 1
PFX g 0 ge .

SFX G Y 5
SFX G en t/g  [^tf]en
SFX G en t/g  [^ao]fen
SFX G fen aft/g afen
SFX G fen oft/g ofen
SFX G en 0/g ten

SFX v Y 12
SFX v tmen tem tmen
SFX v tmen tems tmen
SFX v tmen temt tmen
SFX v nen en nen
SFX v nen ent nen
SFX v nen ens nen
SFX v Ã«n 0 Ã«n
SFX v Ã«n t Ã«n
SFX v Ã«n s Ã«n
SFX v jen ch jen
SFX v jen chs jen
SFX v jen cht jen

SFX U N 4
SFX U 0 er      .
SFX U 0 erin    .
SFX U 0 erinnen .
SFX U 0 erinne  .

SFX z Y 25
SFX z   0     fach           .
SFX z   0     t              .
SFX z   0     ten            .
SFX z   0     tens           .
SFX z   0     te             .
SFX z   0     anzwanzeg      .
SFX z   0     andrësseg      .
SFX z   0     avéierzeg      .
SFX z   0     afofzeg        .
SFX z   0     asiechzeg      .
SFX z   0     asiwwenzeg     .
SFX z   0     anuechtzeg     .
SFX z   0     annonzeg       .
SFX z   0     anzwanzeg      .
SFX z   0     mol            [^n]
SFX z   n     mol            n
SFX z   0     anzwanzegmol   .
SFX z   0     andrëssegmol   .
SFX z   0     avéierzegmol   .
SFX z   0     afofzegmol     .
SFX z   0     asiechzegmol   .
SFX z   0     asiwwenzegmol  .
SFX z   0     anuechtzegmol  .
SFX z   0     anonzegmol     .
SFX z   0     anzwanzegmol   .

PFX Z Y 9
PFX Z   0     honnert        .
PFX Z   0     zweehonnert    .
PFX Z   0     dräihonnert    .
PFX Z   0     véierhonnert   .
PFX Z   0     fënnefhonnert  .
PFX Z   0     sechshonnert   .
PFX Z   0     siwenhonnert   .
PFX Z   0     aachthonnert   .
PFX Z   0     nénghonnert    .

SFX h N 4
SFX h   0     honnert        .
SFX h   0     eckeg          .
SFX h   0     honnertmol     .
SFX h   0     honnertfach    .
