Luxembourgish.dic
Alldagsproblem/R
Alterskategorie/N
Amateurcineast/In
Amphetamin/i
Antwerpen/U
Appartementshaus/u
Arrivée/E
Arriéré/n
Aschlag/e
Associée/N
Asylant/In
Asylanteproblem/R
Ausbildungswee/Q
Aussestehenden/r
Auswanderin/i
Auswee/Q
Awanderin/i
Badge/N
Ball/e
Bankdirekter/Fn
Bankdonnée/E
Basispräis/R
Bauchdänzer/I
Bauerenhaus/u
Bauteminister/Fn
Beebroch/e
Behandlung/n
Beidler/U
Beneficiaire/N
Beruffswee/Q
Bettspree/E
Betätegungsfeld/R
Biathletin/i
Bierden/U
Bitscht/U
Bliederzéngelchen/r
Blëtz/R
Branche/N
Branebuerg/U
Braumeeschter/Fn
Britin/i
Broch/e
Browser/n
BrÃ«lleglas/u
Bréiffrënd/I
Buddelerbaach/U
Buergermeeschter/Fn
Bulgarin/i
Busbilljee/E
Bäckelchen/r
Bänknoper/Fn
Bëschofssëtz/R
Bëschwee/Q
Cadrage/N
Chansonette/N
Cheffin/i
Cheminee/E
Colique/N
Concertsbilljee/E
Concertssall/e
Coorganisatrice/N
Corset/n
Countrysänger/I
Damme/N
Dammennationaltrainer/i
Danzcoursiddi/E
Dausend/R
Dawen/r
Defenseminister/Fn
Dekolletee/E
Devotionalie/N
Dickweiler/U
Dokter/Fn
Dolmetscher/In
Donnerschlag/e
Donnée/E
Dragée/E
Drocksaach/n
Drogekrich/R
Drécken/r
Duerchfall/e
Duerchschnëttsvitesse/N
Däitschprofesser/Fn
Déierendokter/Fn
Echappée/E
Ee/Q
Eefamilljenhaus/u
Eegentum/e
Eenzelspiller/I
Eisepäertchen/r
Ell/U
Energiehaus/u
Engleschprofesser/F
Enseignement/R
Entrée/E
Ersatzbänk/n
Euthanasie/N
Evakuatiounswee/Q
Examenssall/e
Exporter/In
Familljeminister/Fn
Familljenhaus/u
Fee/E
Feelschlag/e
Feldwee/Q
Finanzhaus/u
Finanzproblem/R
Finanzéierungswee/Q
Fixfeieschlued/n
Flammänner/I
Fluchbilljee/E
Folscht/U
Fosse/N
Fraenhaus/u
Franséisin/i
Freier/Fn
Friemen/r
Fräibilljee/E
Fussball/e
Futtballer/I
Gala/n
Gaskraaftwierk/R
Gebeessglas/u
Geckenhaus/u
Gefaangen/r
Gemengewee/Q
Geroch/e
Gesamtnote/N
Gesetzeswee/Q
Gespréichspartner/In
Gewënnspill/R
Glas/u
Goalkeeperin/i
Gottesnar/n
Gouschteng/U
Gras/u
Gratisbilljee/E
Grimmelchen/r
Gëftmëscher/Fn
Haaptentrée/E
Halsbaach/U
Halsofschneider/In
Handicapéierten/r
Haus/u
Heed/R
Heemechtshaus/u
Heizzoulag/n
Herrscherhaus/u
Herzogtum/e
Himmelswee/Q
Hochzäitscortège/N
Holzhaus/u
Hongerhaff/U
Huelwee/Q
HÃ©ichhaus/u
Häerzinfarkten/r
Iddi/E
Ierpeldeng/U
Industrieoffall/e
Informant/In
Informatiounswee/Q
Inspekter/Fn
Instrukter/In
Intenee/Q
Interessekonflikt/R
Interessentin/i
Juge/N
Jugendhaus/u
Justizkommissärin/i
Jëfferchen/r
Kannerdokter/Fn
Kanéngerchersziichter/I
Kapazitéit/n
Keessjee/E
Kiisfurt/U
Killerfilm/R
Kinnekshaus/u
Kirgisin/i
Klischee/E
Kläckelchen/r
Knachebroch/e
Konjunkturdonnée/E
Konkursgesetzgebung/n
Konschtgeschichtsprofesser/Fn
Konzeptkënschtler/I
Krichsfilm/R
Krichsheldin/i
Krichsverbriechen/r
Kräizenhéicht/U
Kuckucksee/Q
Kéistall/e
Lastikspäckelchen/r
Lawin/i
Leader/In
Lenzweiler/U
Liewenswee/Q
Liiblingssänger/In
Lilie/N
Literaturprofesser/Fn
Loftwee/Q
Luxushaus/u
Léierbichelchen/r
Majorzsystem/R
Marscherwald/U
Mathésprofesser/Fn
Matinée/E
Matt/n
Mauretanier/I
Medezin/i
Medienhaus/u
Mirabelle/N
Museksprofesser/Fn
Musekssall/e
Museksstudent/In
Mäertert/U
Mäifelchen/r
Männerberuff/R
Mëspel/n
Mëttelwee/Q
Nervesee/E
Netlëtzebuerger/I
Nidderwampech/U
Niddregenergiehaus/u
Nordkoreanerin/i
Ofsazstrategie/N
Oktoberfest/R
Onfall/e
Opbau/n
Otemwee/Q
Palliativmedezin/i
Parkhaus/u
Parteipresident/In
Patréiner/F
Patréinerin/i
Personalcheffin/i
Phrase/N
Pilgerwee/Q
Pinguin/i
Placard/n
Plenarsall/e
Polizistemäerder/I
Potaaschbierg/U
Premièresdiplom/R
Prinzessin/i
Privathaus/u
Professer/Fn
Promenadewee/Q
Protokollen/r
Präisphilosophie/N
Psychiater/I
Puma/n
Punkerin/i
Referat/R
Rennen/r
Renommee/E
Requête/N
Resultatsäit/n
Reuniounssall/e
Rikschachauffer/In
Rommelerhaff/U
Sakdichelchen/r
Satellittendonnée/E
Saustall/e
Schal/R
Schibbreger/U
Schläichwee/Q
Schléifer/I
Schnuddeler/Fn
Schnéikläckelchen/r
Schnéiwarnung/n
Schoulwee/Q
Schwammmeeschter/Fn
Schwedin/i
Schwéngsstall/e
Sensibiliséierungscampagne/N
Seychellen/r
Seylerhaff/U
Sirer/I
Skateboard/R
Soullegend/n
Spigelee/Q
Sportsfrënd/I
Sportstudentin/i
Stamminee/E
Steebroch/e
Steierdirekter/Fn
Steiervignette/N
Stolbetrib/R
Straussenee/Q
Streckebezeechnung/n
Strëllerchen/r
Summermagazin/i
Summerwee/Q
Tellerchen/r
Tennisball/e
Terroristenorganisatioun/n
Text/R
Textilindustrie/N
Theaterhaus/u
Transportminister/Fn
Transportminister/In
Tratten/U
TÃ©iglas/u
Tëlee/E
Ururgroussmamm/n
Uschlag/e
Verbriechen/r
Verdauongspromenade/N
Verdeedegungsminister/Fn
Verhältnis/R
Verlagshaus/u
Veterinärin/i
Videossall/e
Volleksfro/n
Volleksvertrieder/In
Vulkanen/r
Vëloswee/Q
Waarken/U
Weesenhaus/u
Weltdeel/R
Wirtschaftsminister/Fn
Wolpert/U
Wonnen/r
Wäertegemeinschaft/n
Währungshausse/N
Wäissrussin/i
Zaubersproch/e
Zentralkomitee/E
Zockerkichelchen/r
aacht/Zzh
afferen/VG
al/a
aliteréiert/A
analyséieren/V
arnaquéiert/A
bampelen/V
bedeitend/A
behief/v
bekuck/V
bematleet/v
berechnen/v
besteier/V
biet/v
biischten/VG
bleechen/VG
blo/v
bommelen/V
bonzelen/VG
botsuanesch/A
bremsen/VG
brutzelen/VG
buet/v
bändegen/VG
certifiéieren/V
chillen/VG
consacréiert/A
danzen/V
dehnen/VG
depressiv/A
deroutéier/V
donneren/VG
dreif/v
dreschen/V
dräizéng/Z
drëpsen/VG
duerchsetzbar/A
déiden/VG
eelef/Z
eeler/a
een/Zh
empfänken/V
entdee/v
entgéintkomm/A
entscheet/v
erfaass/V
ermort/v
erwieder/V
exekutéiert/A
faassen/V
fichéiert/A
fierf/v
flemmzen/V
fofzéng/Z
folgend/a
friet/v
froen/VG
fréieren/VG
funken/VG
futtballeresch/A
fändelen/V
fënnef/Zzh
gackeren/VG
ganz/a
gebëselt/A
gefléift/A
gehéiereg/A
genéisserlech/A
geschwäermt/A
gewënscht/A
grasséieren/V
grouss/a
gruef/v
gäipen/VG
hief/v
hocken/V
héichproblematesch/A
hënnescht/a
iewescht/a
inspiréier/V
iwwerlee/v
iwwerriet/v
iwwerschësseg/A
iwwerstreit/v
jonk/a
kaschten/VG
klaatschen/VG
klief/v
klunschen/V
kredibel/A
kuschen/V
kussen/VG
këssen/VG
laut/v
lief/v
léit/v
mesopotamesch/A
mol/V
nonzéng/Z
néng/Zzh
onbestänneg/A
opgedeet/a
otmen/v
phenolhalteg/A
pilger/V
radotéieren/V
rechnen/v
regelrecht/A
reviséier/V
scheet/v
schwéierfälleg/A
sechs/Zzh
seefen/V
siechzéng/Z
siwen/Zzh
siwwenzéng/Z
spreet/v
tatkräfteg/A
temperéieren/V
uechtzéng/Z
verkéiersméisseg/A
verrëtschen/V
virlescht/a
véier/Zzh
véierzéng/Z
waart/v
wiederen/VG
wierfelen/VG
wiesselen/VG
wollten/VG
wullen/VG
wëschen/VG
zefriddestellend/A
zwaffen/VG
zwanzeg/Z
zwee/Zzh
zwielef/Z
zéng/Z
Ännerungsvirschlag/e
Éierendirekter/F
Ëlwen/U
Ëmschreiwung/n
Ëmverdeelungssystem/R
Ëmwee/Q
äiskalen/V
ënnerscheet/v
